Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.050

Public works assistance account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5802-S2.SL) ***

(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Moneys in the account may be transferred to the move ahead WA account to provide support of public works projects funded in the move ahead WA program. Not more than 20 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than 10 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the community aviation revitalization board. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. The legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for projects identified in section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for an evaluation of the costs of relocating public utilities related to fish barrier removal projects. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to developing a data dashboard to map investments made by the public works board, the department of commerce, the department of health, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and by board partners to the system improvement team created in RCW 43.155.150.

(2) For fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2038, the state treasurer must transfer from the public works assistance account to the move ahead WA account created in RCW 46.68.510 $57,000,000 each fiscal year in four equal quarterly transfers.

[ 2023 c 475 s 932; 2023 c 474 s 8037. Prior: 2022 c 296 s 7009; 2022 c 182 s 302; 2022 c 157 s 15; prior: 2021 c 334 s 979; 2021 c 332 s 7031; prior: 2019 c 415 s 972; 2019 c 413 s 7033; prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 5; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 974; prior: 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 959; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7032; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 983; 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6004; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 951; prior: 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 932; 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6007; (2009 c 564 s 940 expired June 30, 2011); (2008 c 328 s 6002 expired June 30, 2011); 2007 c 520 s 6037; (2007 c 520 s 6036 expired June 30, 2011); prior: 2005 c 488 s 925; (2005 c 425 s 4 expired June 30, 2011); 2001 c 131 s 2; prior: 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 918; 1995 c 376 s 11; 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 921; 1985 c 471 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2023 c 474 s 8037 and by 2023 c 475 s 932, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Effective date—2022 c 296: See note following RCW 43.63A.125.

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 182: See notes following RCW 70A.65.240.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2019 c 413: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 2: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 23, 2012]." [ 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6013.]

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 951: "Section 951 of this act takes effect June 30, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 952.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 36: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 4, 2010]." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6018.]

Expiration date—2009 c 564 s 940: "Section 940 of this act expires June 30, 2011." [ 2009 c 564 s 962.]

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Expiration date—2008 c 328 s 6002: "Section 6002 of this act expires June 30, 2011." [ 2008 c 328 s 6018.]

Part headings not law—2008 c 328: "Part headings in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2008 c 328 s 6020.]

Severability—2008 c 328: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2008 c 328 s 6021.]

Effective date—2008 c 328: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 1, 2008]." [ 2008 c 328 s 6022.]

Expiration date—2007 c 520 s 6036: "Section 6036 of this act expires June 30, 2011." [ 2007 c 520 s 6039.]

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective dates—2007 c 520: See notes following RCW 43.19.125.

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective dates—2005 c 488: See notes following RCW 28B.50.360.

Finding—2005 c 425: "The legislature has and continues to recognize the vital importance of economic development to the health and prosperity of Washington state as indicated in RCW 43.160.010, * 43.155.070(4)(g), 43.163.005, and 43.168.010. The legislature finds that current economic development programs and funding, which are primarily low-interest loan programs, can be enhanced by creating a grant program to assist with public infrastructure projects that directly stimulate community and economic development by supporting the creation of new jobs or the retention of existing jobs." [ 2005 c 425 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.155.070 was amended by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 9, deleting subsection (4)(g).

Expiration date—2005 c 425: "This act expires June 30, 2011." [ 2005 c 425 s 6.]

Severability—2005 c 425: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2005 c 425 s 7.]

Severability—Effective date—1995 2nd sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 19.118.110.

Findings—1995 c 376: See note following RCW 70A.100.060.

Severability—Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 471: See notes following RCW 82.04.260.